Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1 UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO
23-20-123. Rents or charges for buildings and facilities for research.

The regents of the university of Colorado are authorized to contract for or impose and collect rents or charges for the use of university buildings and facilities for research, including research conducted by or under the auspices of the university of Colorado. Such rents or charges shall be at a level reasonably calculated to return or amortize the cost of such buildings and facilities within a reasonable period not exceeding the life of such buildings and facilities; but such user charges or rents may not be imposed and collected in such a manner as to require payment directly or indirectly from the state general fund, tuition receipts, or student fees.

Source:

L. 64:

p. 632, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-34.

23-20-124. Research building revolving fund - appropriation of fund.

There is established in the office of the treasurer of the university a fund to be known as the university of Colorado research building revolving fund. There shall be credited to said fund the user charges or rents authorized by section 23-20-123 and imposed by the board of regents of the university of Colorado, specific appropriations or grants or gifts made to said fund, and the proceeds of the sale of anticipation warrants authorized by sections 23-20-123 to 23-20-125. No payments from student fees, tuition receipts, or general funds shall be deposited in the research building revolving fund or used for said programs; except that the board of regents is authorized, pursuant to sections 23-5-102 and 23-5-103, to pledge the revenues and net income of any other designated enterprise auxiliary facilities in connection with bonds or other obligations secured by the research building revolving fund. All interest accumulated in this fund shall follow the fund. All such moneys so credited to said fund are appropriated to the university of Colorado for the payment of maintenance and operating costs for its research buildings and facilities and for the planning, construction, and equipping of additional research buildings and facilities for the university of Colorado; except that the board of regents is authorized, pursuant to sections 23-5-102 and 23-5-103, to pledge the research building revolving fund in connection with bonds or other obligations issued by or on behalf of any other designated enterprise auxiliary facilities.

Source:

L. 64:

p. 632, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-35.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 830, § 2, effective May 8.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 550, § 1, effective March 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 11, effective May 24; entire section amended, p. 904, § 2, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 99-203 and House Bill 99-1338 were harmonized.

23-20-125. Anticipation warrants.

The state treasurer is authorized to issue anticipation warrants in such amounts as requested by the board of regents of the university of Colorado, the total amount of which shall not exceed four million dollars, to be repaid exclusively from the user revenues accruing to the university of Colorado research building revolving fund as provided in sections 23-20-123 to 23-20-125 or from revenues and net income of any other designated enterprise auxiliary facilities that are pledged to the repayment of such anticipation warrants pursuant to sections 23-5-102 and 23-5-103, or any combination thereof; such anticipation warrants shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding four percent per annum except those issued on or after February 15, 1968, which shall bear interest not exceeding six percent per annum, and shall not be sold at a price less than the face value thereof. Disbursements from said fund shall be only by warrant upon vouchers certified by the board of regents of the university of Colorado.

Source:

L. 64:

p. 633, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-36.

L. 68:

p. 6, § 1.

L. 71:

p. 1181, § 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 904, § 3, effective August 4.

23-20-126. Purchase of anticipation warrants.

It is lawful for any public entity, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., to purchase anticipation warrants issued in pursuance of section 23-20-125 if such warrants satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.; but not to exceed twenty percent of the total of any specific fund of such public entity shall be invested in such warrants.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 18, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-37.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1128, § 61, effective July 1.

23-20-127. Warrants as security - when.

Anticipation warrants issued in pursuance of sections 23-20-123 to 23-20-129 may be used as security for any depository bond or obligation where any kind of bonds or other securities shall or may, by law, be deposited as security.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 18, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-38.

23-20-128. Tax exemption.

Any anticipation warrants issued pursuant to the provisions of section 23-20-125 by the regents of the university of Colorado shall be exempt from taxation for state, county, school district, special district, municipal, or other purposes in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 18, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-39.

23-20-129. Bonds.

The regents of the university of Colorado are hereby authorized to issue bonds as provided in this section for the purpose of obtaining funds for the planning, construction or other acquisition, and equipping of research buildings and facilities, wherever located in the state of Colorado, for the university of Colorado. Any such buildings and facilities shall be related to the research mission of the university.

Such bonds shall be in such amount, shall mature at such time or times, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, and shall otherwise be sold and issued in such manner and on such terms as provided by the regents of the university of Colorado.

Such bonds shall be payable from, and shall be secured by a pledge of, the university of Colorado research building revolving fund created in section 23-20-124, or the revenues and net income of any other designated enterprise auxiliary facilities that are pledged to the repayment of such bonds pursuant to sections 23-5-102 and 23-5-103, or any combination thereof.

The authority contained in this section shall be in addition to the authority granted the regents of the university of Colorado to issue anticipation warrants pursuant to section 23-20-125; except that nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the issuance of such bonds if by such issuance the obligation of any contract entered into with respect to any outstanding anticipation warrants would thereby be impaired.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be exempt from taxation for state, county, school district, special district, municipal, or other purposes in the state of Colorado.

Bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not constitute a debt or an indebtedness of the state within the meaning of any applicable provision of the state constitution or state statutes.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 19, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-40.

L. 68:

p. 6, § 2.

L. 70:

p. 347, § 4.

L. 82:

Entire section R&RE, p. 343, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 86:

(1) and (6) amended, p. 830, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(6) amended, p. 550, § 2, effective March 1.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 905, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(6) amended, p. 67, § 1, effective August 3.

23-20-129.5. Enterprise auxiliary facility bonds.

The board of regents shall establish policies and procedures to determine and monitor the ability of the university of Colorado:

To pay principal, interest, and any other costs due in connection with any revenue bonds issued pursuant to section 23-5-102;

To establish and maintain the necessary reserves required to pay the principal, interest, and other costs due in connection with any revenue bonds issued pursuant to section 23-5-102;

To pay costs of operation and maintenance of the auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities on behalf of which revenue bonds are issued pursuant to section 23-5-102; and

To satisfy all covenants and agreements set forth in any resolution, indenture, or other document authorizing or executed in connection with the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to section 23-5-102.

The policies and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include, but need not be limited to, the following requirements:

That, upon issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to section 23-5-102, the university shall identify the primary revenue sources for payment of principal and interest on the bonds from among those revenues and other moneys pledged for payment of principal and interest on the revenue bonds;

That, upon issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to section 23-5-102, the university shall perform a financial analysis, based upon assumptions approved by the board of regents and the state auditor, that demonstrates that revenues expected to be annually available from the sources identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) will be sufficient to pay at least one hundred twenty-five percent of the annual principal and interest on the revenue bonds;

That the university shall annually review the revenue sources identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to determine if the financial analysis required in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) shows sufficient revenues for payment of principal and interest on the revenue bonds and, if the revenues are not sufficient, take such action as the board of regents and the state auditor shall require to assure that adequate revenues are available to pay the principal and interest on the revenue bonds;

That the maximum annual debt service on all revenue bonds issued pursuant to section 23-5-102, except as provided for in sections 23-5-101.8 and 23-5-103, outstanding at any time for the university shall not exceed ten percent of the university's unrestricted current fund expenditures plus mandatory transfers;

That the university shall establish and maintain such debt service reserves and such reserves for repair and replacement of any auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities on behalf of which revenue bonds are issued pursuant to section 23-5-102 and as may be required by the terms of the resolution, indenture, or other document authorizing or executed in connection with the issuance of the revenue bonds and subject to review and approval by the state auditor; and

That the university shall annually report to the state auditor regarding compliance with the requirements specified in this subsection (2) and any additional requirements that may be imposed by the board of regents.

The policies and procedures required under this section shall be established no later than January 1, 1995, and shall apply to any revenue bonds issued pursuant to section 23-5-102 on or after such date.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1679, § 5, effective May 31.

L. 2004:

(2)(d) amended, p. 1936, § 6, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsection (2)(d), see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

23-20-130. Disposition of natural specimens.

All specimens of natural history and geological and mineralogical specimens which are collected by the state geologist of Colorado, appointed by the state to investigate its natural history, belong to and are the property of the university and form a part of its cabinet.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2759.

G.S.

§ 3450.

R.S. 08:

§ 6946.

C.L.

§ 8008.

CSA:

C. 169, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-13.

23-20-131. Free pupil from each county.

Each county is entitled to send one pupil under the age of seventeen years to said university, tuition free, said pupil to be selected by competitive examination before the county superintendent of such county and given to the highest scholarship.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 308, § 1.

G.L.

§ 2746.

G.S.

§ 3439.

R.S. 08:

§ 6934.

C.L.

§ 7997.

CSA:

C. 169, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-2.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1214, § 9, effective July 1, 2007.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 265, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

23-20-132. When tuition fee charged.

The university shall charge a reasonable tuition fee for all out-of-state students, as provided in article 7 of this title.

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 474, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 6935.

C.L.

§ 7998.

CSA:

C. 169, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-3.

L. 73:

p. 1416, § 92.

23-20-133. Religious societies not to control.

The university shall never be under the control of any religious or irreligious denomination or society.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2749.

G.S.

§ 3440.

R.S. 08:

§ 6936.

C.L.

§ 7999.

CSA:

C. 169, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-4.

23-20-134. No loans to board or faculty - exception.

No funds of the university shall ever be, directly or indirectly, loaned to the president or any of the regents, professors, or other officers of the said university; except that the board of regents may make loans secured by an equity interest in real estate in Colorado from funds not appropriated by the general assembly to full-time faculty members if such secured loans are made pursuant to a faculty housing assistance plan promulgated and approved by the board of regents.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2771.

G.S.

§ 3462.

L. 1895:

p. 238, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 6959.

C.L.

§ 8030.

CSA:

C. 169, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-20.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1115, § 1, effective May 28.

23-20-135. Contracting debt forbidden, when.

The board of regents is prohibited from creating any debt against the university, in any manner encumbering the same, or incurring any expense beyond its ability to pay from the annual income of the university for the current year.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2774.

G.S.

§ 3465.

R.S. 08:

§ 6962.

C.L.

§ 8033.

CSA:

C. 169, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-23.

23-20-136. Fitzsimons trust fund - creation - legislative declaration - repeal.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the university of Colorado health sciences center will be moving to the former Fitzsimons Army base over the next several decades; that the health sciences center can expect a major portion of the move to take place in the next ten to fifteen years; that creation of a trust fund would allow the state to set aside funds over a period of years in order to have moneys available at the time the most costly capital construction requests would be expected to occur; and that, in addition to the state moneys to be dedicated to the trust fund, other sources of funding for the move are being sought from the federal government, private and public sources, and the health sciences center and university hospital.

In light of the projected amounts of state revenues that will be available over the next six years, the general assembly hereby finds and declares that a stable, predictable, and consistent source of revenues for the university of Colorado health sciences center's move to the former Fitzsimons Army base will better allow the state to help fund such a move. In order to provide a consistent source of revenues, the general assembly further finds and declares that it is appropriate to create a trust fund that will be provided with an annual amount of principal and that will generate an annual amount of interest that is dedicated to the university of Colorado health sciences center's move to the former Fitzsimons Army base.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the university of Colorado health sciences center at Fitzsimons trust fund, referred to in this section as the "Fitzsimons trust fund", the principal of which shall consist of those general fund revenues that may be transferred to the capital construction fund as provided in section 24-75-302 (2), C.R.S., and then appropriated from the capital construction fund to the Fitzsimons trust fund and of moneys appropriated to the Fitzsimons trust fund from the capital construction fund pursuant to subsection (3.5) of this section. The principal and interest of the Fitzsimons trust fund shall not be expended or appropriated for any purpose other than that stated in subsection (5) of this section. The state treasurer may, in the state treasurer's discretion, deposit, redeposit, invest, and reinvest moneys accrued or accruing to the Fitzsimons trust fund in the types of deposits and investments authorized in sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) to the contrary, on May 5, 2010, the state treasurer shall deduct five million fifty-four thousand nine hundred eighteen dollars from the Fitzsimons trust fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) to the contrary, on July 1, 2010, the state treasurer shall deduct three million four hundred forty-eight thousand five hundred thirty-seven dollars from the Fitzsimons trust fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

(3.5) (a) For the 2016-17 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter in which the state receives money pursuant to the master settlement agreement, and in which money is due to a lessor under a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement authorized pursuant to section 3 of House Bill 03-1256, enacted in 2003, the state treasurer shall transfer to the capital construction fund and the state controller shall transfer from the capital construction fund to the Fitzsimons trust fund, except as otherwise provided in section 24-75-1104.5 (5), eight percent of the total amount received by the state pursuant to the master settlement agreement, other than attorney fees and costs, during the preceding fiscal year.

As used in this subsection (3.5), unless the context otherwise requires, "master settlement agreement" means the master settlement agreement, the smokeless tobacco master settlement agreement, and the consent decree approved and entered by the court in the case denominated State of Colorado, ex rel. Gale A. Norton, Attorney General v. R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co.; American Tobacco Co., Inc.; Brown & Williamson Tobacco Corp.; Liggett & Myers, Inc.; Lorillard Tobacco Co., Inc.; Philip Morris, Inc.; United States Tobacco Co.; B.A.T. Industries, P.L.C.; The Council For Tobacco Research--U.S.A., Inc.; and Tobacco Institute, Inc., Case No. 97 CV 3432, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

On September 1, 1998, and on September 1 of each year thereafter, the state treasurer shall certify to the general assembly the amount of interest actually earned on the principal of the Fitzsimons trust fund during the previous fiscal year and shall provide an estimate of the interest expected to be earned on such principal during the current fiscal year.

Money in the Fitzsimons trust fund may be appropriated to pay for capital construction projects for the university of Colorado health sciences center at the former Fitzsimons Army base that have received the prior approval of the board of regents of the university of Colorado, the Colorado commission on higher education, the capital development committee, the general assembly, and the joint budget committee or for payments on any financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement authorized pursuant to section 3 of House Bill 03-1256, as enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-fourth general assembly.

The creation of the Fitzsimons trust fund shall in no way reduce or eliminate the opportunity of the university of Colorado health sciences center to seek funding for capital and controlled maintenance projects through the normal annual capital development committee prioritization process.

All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the Fitzsimons trust fund shall be credited to said fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the Fitzsimons trust fund shall remain therein and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2032.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 804, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 99:

(7) amended, p. 624, § 23, effective August 4.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 152, § 7, effective March 27.

L. 2003:

(3)(a) and (5) amended and (3.5) added, p. 1378, § 8, effective April 28.

L. 2004:

(3.5)(a) amended, p. 1709, § 6, effective June 4; (3)(a) amended, p. 1213, § 106, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(3.5)(a) amended, p. 767, § 34, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(3.5)(a) amended, p. 1036, § 4, effective May 25.

L. 2008:

(8) amended, p. 297, § 1, effective April 3.

L. 2009:

(3.5)(a) amended, (SB 09-269), ch. 333, p. 1766, § 4, effective June 1; (3)(a) amended, (SB 09-228), ch. 410, p. 2257, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3)(c) and (3)(d) added, (HB 10-1389), ch. 206, p. 897, § 9, effective May 5.

L. 2016:

(3)(b) repealed and (3.5)(a) amended, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, pp. 472, 461, §§ 26, 4, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3.5)(a) and (5) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2020, § 26, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending subsections (3)(a) and (5) and enacting subsection (3.5), see section 1 of chapter 190, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

23-20-137. Health sciences center - disposition of property - use of proceeds.

On or before June 30, 2004, the university of Colorado shall develop a master plan for the development, sale, and use of the campus at ninth avenue and Colorado boulevard and the university of Colorado hospital.

On or before June 30, 2006, the university of Colorado shall enter into an agreement with a third-party master developer to carry out the development, sale, or use of the real estate interests of the university of Colorado in the campus at ninth avenue and Colorado boulevard, including, but not limited to, the university's real estate interests in the ground leased to the university of Colorado hospital, that will maximize the moneys available for the move of the Colorado health sciences center to the former Fitzsimons Army base.

For purposes of this subsection (3), unless the context otherwise requires, "net proceeds from ninth avenue and Colorado boulevard" means the proceeds from the sale, ground lease, or other disposition of the real estate interest of the university of Colorado in the ninth avenue and Colorado boulevard campus, including, but not limited to, the university's interests in the ground leased to the university of Colorado hospital, less actual and reasonable costs of completing the transaction and less any unsatisfied debt or other obligation relating to such real estate interests.

Of the net proceeds from ninth avenue and Colorado boulevard, up to fifteen million dollars shall be deposited into the general fund. Any net proceeds from ninth avenue and Colorado boulevard in excess of fifteen million dollars shall be divided equally with one-half being deposited into the general fund and one-half being retained by the university of Colorado for the development of the Fitzsimons campus.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1378, § 7, effective April 28.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 190, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

23-20-138. Health sciences center - definitions - accountable student program - creation.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Accountable student" means a person who, as of the date of his or her selection for admission into a university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center professional health care program, will not be receiving funding from the state of Colorado or a cooperative state for any portion of the costs incurred in participating in a university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center professional health care program.

"Board" means the board of regents of the university of Colorado.

"Cooperative state" means a state that has entered into a cooperative agreement with the state of Colorado pursuant to section 24-60-601, C.R.S.

"Special support fee" means the fee determined by the board pursuant to subsection (5) of this section to reflect the difference between the actual costs of education for an accountable student enrolled in a university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center professional health care program and the tuition assessed to the accountable student.

The board is hereby authorized to enter into a contract concerning the assessment of a special support fee with each accountable student.

Each accountable student shall enter into a contract with the board that shall provide that, as a condition of the accountable student's continued enrollment in a university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center professional health care program, a special support fee shall be paid annually to the board by or on behalf of the accountable student pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Beginning in the 2006-07 academic year, the board may annually assess each accountable student a special support fee as the board determines necessary pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. The fee required to be collected pursuant to this subsection (4) is based on an accountable student's status as an accountable student at the time of selection for admission into a university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center professional health care program and shall not be reduced or waived regardless of the accountable student's future status as an in-state student, pursuant to the provisions of section 23-7-103, at any time during the accountable student's participation in a university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center professional health care program. If after the first year the accountable student ceases to participate in his or her university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center professional health care program for reasons other than a medical disability, he or she shall repay to the university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center professional health care program the difference between the amount paid for the special support fee and the amount of tuition that would have been otherwise assessed to the accountable student.

The board shall determine annually the amount of the special support fee based on recommendations from each university of Colorado at Denver and health sciences center campus offering professional health care program courses. (6) The fee-for-service contract negotiated between the board and the department of higher education pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 must specify the amount of funding for educational services provided to graduate students by the state of Colorado. A graduate student receiving educational services paid for by the state of Colorado is not eligible to be an accountable student.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 522, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(6) amended, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 614, § 13, effective May 9.

L. 2020:

(6) amended, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 835, § 15, effective July 1, 2021.

23-20-139. Retirement plan - eligibility - election.

The university of Colorado president, chancellors, deans, other professionals exempt from the state personnel system, and faculty as determined by the board of regents to be eligible to participate in a university of Colorado retirement plan shall be members of a university retirement plan and covered under social security if required by federal law; except that, upon initial appointment to or employment in a position described in this subsection (1), an employee who is a member or inactive member of the association shall elect, within thirty days after such appointment, either to join the association in accordance with the provisions of article 51 of title 24, C.R.S., or to participate in a university retirement plan.

For purposes of this section, "association" means the public employees' retirement association created pursuant to section 24-51-201, C.R.S.

An election made by an employee pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be irrevocable and shall remain the election of the employee at any time the employee is employed by the university in a position described in subsection (1) of this section.

An election to participate in a university retirement plan pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be in writing and shall be filed with the association and with the university in a manner prescribed by the university.

An election to join the association pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be in writing in the manner provided by the association and shall be filed with the association no more than thirty days after the election.

If an employee fails to make an election pursuant to the provisions of this section, the employee shall be a member of the association.

The university shall be solely responsible for educating employees and providing information to employees about the process provided in this section and for the administration of the process.

Administrative actions or civil actions brought by employees to dispute the election for participation or failure to elect participation in the association or a university retirement plan shall commence within one hundred eighty days after the election or within one hundred eighty days after the date on which the employee may make an election to participate in such plan pursuant to this section, whichever is earlier, and not thereafter.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-157), ch. 146, p. 612, § 1, effective August 5.

23-20-140. Partnership for rural education preparation - created - report.

The general assembly finds that:

There is a teacher shortage across the state, particularly in rural areas, which jeopardizes Colorado's ability to maintain the highest standards in education delivery;

There are various causes of the teacher shortage; and

There are resources available, and potentially available, that could help alleviate the teacher shortage; however, due to the unique causes of teacher shortages across the state, there is a need for collaboration to connect local education providers with resources to develop customized solutions.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that the creation of a partnership for rural education is an effective way to reduce teacher shortages in Colorado.

There is created the partnership for rural education preparation on the Denver campus of the university of Colorado, referred to in this section as the "partnership", to collaborate with other institutions of higher education to bring customized solutions to local education providers to address teacher shortages. Subject to available appropriations, and in collaboration with local education providers, the partnership shall work with identified local education providers to:

Regularly collect and report data on the current and projected hiring needs for the local education provider, including turnover trends, for teachers by geographic and content area;

Determine the causes of teacher shortages;

Identify available and potentially available resources that align supply and demand when addressing the teacher shortages;

Connect these resources to the local education provider through customized solutions targeted to the specific causes of the teacher shortage for the local education provider;

To the extent possible, identify methods for improving diversity of teachers; and

Provide technical assistance in implementing the local education provider's customized solution.

The partnership shall prepare and submit an annual report for each year in which the partnership is operating to the department of education, the department of higher education, and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, concerning data collected and strategies identified by the partnership to address teacher shortages across the state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23-1-104 (1) to the contrary, the appropriation of money for purposes of this section is not included within the single line item appropriation to the regents of the university of Colorado. Any unexpended and unencumbered money appropriated for purposes of this section remains available for expenditure for purposes of this section in the next fiscal year without further appropriation.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1309), ch. 269, p. 1663, § 9, effective August 8.

23-20-141. Emerging technologies for water management - study - report - legislative declaration - repeal.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section and in collaboration with Colorado state university and the Colorado water institute created in section 23-31-801, the university of Colorado shall conduct feasibility studies and pilot deployments of new and emerging technologies that have potential to improve the monitoring, management, conservation, and allocation of surface water and groundwater and to reduce inefficiency and waste in the process of recycling, reclaiming, or disposing of produced water and wastewater.

The technologies to be investigated by the universities and the institute pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section may include:

In-situ sensors to monitor surface and groundwater use;

Direct or remote sensors to monitor water quality;

Cellular and satellite telemetry systems allowing remote access to sensor data;

Aerial observation platforms, including high-altitude balloons and unmanned aerial vehicles;

Satellite-based remote sensing and water resource forecasting technologies; and

Blockchain-based documentation, communication, and authentication of data regarding water use; fulfillment of obligations under Colorado's system of prior appropriation, including augmentation plans; and water conservation.

On or before July 15, 2022, and upon request of the water resources and agriculture review committee of the general assembly in any year thereafter, the universities shall provide live testimony and a written report on the progress of the feasibility studies and pilot deployments conducted pursuant to this subsection (1), including any conclusions regarding the potential of these technologies to improve Colorado water management and any recommendations for administrative or legislative action to promote their use, to the water resources and agriculture review committee.

Any feasibility studies or pilot deployments made pursuant to this section, and any recommendations for administrative or legislative action to promote the use of the technologies considered, must take account of the existing system of prior appropriation under article XVI of the state constitution and Colorado water law. The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that nothing in this section shall be construed to encourage or enable speculation in water or water rights.

The university of Colorado and Colorado state university may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section. The universities shall not conduct the feasibility studies or pilot deployments described in subsection (1) of this section unless they have received at least forty thousand dollars pursuant to this subsection (2) on or before June 1, 2022. The general assembly shall appropriate forty thousand dollars from the general fund to the department of higher education, with twenty thousand dollars allocated to each university, for the purposes of this section; except that the appropriation is contingent on the universities receiving forty thousand dollars in gifts, grants, and donations on or before June 1, 2022, and certifying in writing to the state controller that said amount has been received on or before June 1, 2022.

The universities shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing, by e-mail sent to revisorofstatutes.ga@state.co.us, whether the universities received, by June 1, 2022, the amount of money specified in subsection (2) of this section.

If the notice from the universities states that, as of June 1, 2022, the universities did not receive the amount of money specified in subsection (2) of this section, this section is repealed, effective September 1, 2022.

If the notice from the universities states that, as of June 1, 2022, the universities did receive the amount of money specified in subsection (2) of this section, this subsection (3) is repealed, effective upon the date identified in the notice that the money was received or, if the notice does not specify that date, upon the date of the notice to the revisor of statutes.

Each of the universities shall:

Report and regularly update on its website the amount and source of money received pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and, if the money is a gift, grant, or donation, the identity of the donor and the purpose and period of time for which the money is available;

Report annually the amount and source of money received pursuant to subsection (2) of this section in the prior state fiscal year at the hearing required by the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2, and, if the money is a gift, grant, or donation, the name of the source of the money and the grantee; and

Include the information specified in subsection (4)(a) of this section in any published report on the outcome of any feasibility study or pilot deployment and any published recommendations based on that outcome.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1268), ch. 258, p. 1516, § 2, effective June 18.

L. 2022:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 22-030), ch. 59, p. 269, § 3, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1268, see section 1 of chapter 258, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.